California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board, or any individual voter or bona fide association of citizens entitled to vote on the district formation proposition, or any combination of such voters and associations of citizens, may file a written argument for or a written argument against the proposed district formation.

Arguments shall not exceed 300 words in length and shall be filed with the officials in charge of conducting the election not less than 54 days prior to the date of the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.3.

If more than one argument for or more than one argument against the proposed district formation is filed with the election officials within the time prescribed, such election officials shall select one of the arguments for printing and distribution to the voters.

In selecting the arguments, the election officials shall give preference and priority in the order named to the arguments of the following:

(a) The board of supervisors or any member or members of the board authorized by the board.

(b) Individual voters or bona fide associations of citizens or a combination of such voters and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.4.

The elections officials in charge of conducting the election shall cause a ballot pamphlet concerning the district formation proposition to be voted on to be printed and mailed to each voter entitled to vote on the district formation question.

The ballot pamphlet shall contain the following, in the order prescribed:

(a) The complete text of the proposition.

(b) The impartial analysis of the proposition, prepared by the local agency formation commission.

(c) The argument for the proposed district formation.

(d) The argument against the proposed district formation.

The elections officials shall mail a ballot pamphlet to each voter entitled to vote in the district formation election at least 10 days prior to the date of the election. The ballot pamphlet is “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 157.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1181.

For the purposes of this chapter the board of supervisors and the county elections official, respectively, shall have all the powers and duties that boards of trustees and city clerks have under Section 1180 and the terms “city,” “municipal election,” “board of trustees,” and “city clerk,” shall mean “proposed memorial district,” “proposed memorial district election,” “board of supervisors,” and “county clerk.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.

If a majority of the votes cast at the special election are in favor of formation of the district, the county elections official shall, within ten days after the board of supervisors has declared the result thereof, record in the office of the county recorder a complete certified copy of the statement of results entered on the minutes of the board of supervisors in accordance with Section 1180, together with a complete certified copy of the petition for formation of the district, except that the signatures on the petition need not be certified and recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1183.

Such certified copies when recorded shall, after sixty days from the date of the special election, be conclusive evidence against all persons, firms, associations and corporations, except the State, of the regular and sufficient formation of the district and establishment of the boundaries thereof as set forth in the petition and of the validity of all proceedings preliminary to the formation and establishment of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1185.

A district may be formed in the manner prescribed by this article that is within an existing memorial district, if, in addition to the petition required by Section 1173, there is filed with the county elections official a verified copy of a resolution by the board of the existing district consenting to the formation of the new district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Management [1190. - 1208.]

1190.

Every district shall be a public corporation, have perpetual succession, and may:

(a) Sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(b) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(c) Call upon the district attorney for legal advice and assistance in all matters concerning the district.

(d) Make contracts, employ labor, and do all acts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of any of the powers of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1190.5.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.

(a) Every district may do all of the following:

(1) Provide and maintain memorial halls, assembly halls, buildings, or meeting places, together with suitable indoor and outdoor park and recreation facilities, including swimming pools, picnic areas, and playgrounds, for the use of persons or organizations other than veterans, pursuant to paragraphs (8) and (9), and veteran soldiers, sailors, and marines who have honorably served the United States in any wars or campaigns recognized by law for the purposes of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, or for the use of patriotic, fraternal, or benevolent associations of those persons. However,
 no district shall provide and maintain indoor and outdoor park and recreation facilities, including swimming pools, picnic areas, and playgrounds, unless these projects have been approved by a majority of the voters at either the general district election or at a special election called for that purpose. The question of whether the district shall provide and maintain indoor and outdoor park and recreation facilities may be submitted to the registered voters of the district by the board on its own motion and shall be submitted by the board upon petition signed by 8 percent of the registered voters of the district, at either the general district election or at a special election called for that purpose. If submitted at a special election, the election shall be called, conducted, governed, and regulated in the same manner as the general district election.

All
 plans for indoor and outdoor park and recreation facilities, including swimming pools, picnic areas, and playgrounds, shall be approved initially by the board of supervisors.

(2) Purchase, receive by donation, condemn, lease, or acquire real or personal property necessary or convenient for the construction or maintenance of halls, buildings, meeting places, and facilities, and improve, preserve, manage, and control these facilities.

(3) Purchase, construct, lease, build, furnish, or repair halls, buildings, meeting places, and facilities upon sites owned or leased by the district or made available to the district, and provide custodians, employees, attendants, and supplies for the proper maintenance, care, and management of those halls, buildings, meeting places, and
 facilities.

(4) Furnish sites for halls, buildings, meeting places, or facilities, to be built either by the district or by or for patriotic, fraternal, or benevolent associations of veterans, if the funds for these sites are supplied by the district or from other sources.

(5) Enter into agreements with county, municipal, school, park, or other public authorities or agencies conveying, leasing, or making available to the district, either gratuitously or for compensation, sites upon public land for the construction, maintenance, and management by the district of assembly or memorial halls, buildings, meeting places, or facilities, and construct and maintain on those sites halls, buildings, meeting places, or facilities.

(6) Sell or lease any district property to the highest responsible bidder, as determined by the board, except as provided by Section 1191.3. The board shall, prior to any sale, make a call for bids and advertise that call pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, inviting sealed bids for the sale or lease of the property. The board may either accept the highest responsible bid or reject all bids. The board may require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient undertaking to be approved by the board to insure faithful performance of the contract of sale or lease. No sale or lease shall be transacted, however, if a petition has been filed with the board requesting it not to enter into the sale or lease of the property.

The petition shall have affixed to it, as
 petitioners, the signatures, indicating place of residence and place of signing, of the registered voters of the district in a number equal to at least 10 percent of the votes cast in the district at the last preceding general election held in the state.

If the petition meets these requirements, as determined by the records of the county elections official for the county or counties in which the district is situated, the board either shall not convey the property or shall submit the matter to the registered voters of the district to be voted upon at the next primary or general election, or at a special election called for the purpose of ratifying or rejecting the action of the district to sell or lease the property.

(7) Sell or lease any district property to any political subdivision, or portion
 thereof, in which the district is situated for purposes of roads, streets, or highways, or for the improvement of roads, streets, or highways, without regard to the highest responsible bidder but otherwise meeting the petition requirements of paragraph (6).

(8) Adopt, from time to time, reasonable rules and regulations for the use of halls, buildings, meeting places, and facilities by veterans or by organizations of veterans, and to allow the halls, buildings, meeting places, and facilities to be used for lawful purposes consistent with the objects of this section by persons or organizations other than veterans either free of charge or for stated compensation to aid in defraying the cost of maintenance of the facilities, if that use will not unduly interfere with the reasonable use of the facilities by veterans’ associations.

(9) Enter into a joint powers agreement for recreational or senior citizens’ services within the district.

(b) In conformance with this section, a district may provide recreational facilities or services at any location within the district regardless of the location of district-owned facilities. A district may not increase its tax levy for the purpose of providing recreational services for persons other than veterans unless that increase is first approved by a majority of the registered voters of the district who vote upon the proposal.

(c) (1) A district may provide
 funding to providers of supportive services that improve the quality of life for veterans and their families. Those supportive services may include, but are not limited to, behavioral health services, counseling, social services, case management, affordable housing, and employment training and placement.

(2) A district may not use existing bond moneys for the purposes described in paragraph (1), unless either of the following circumstances apply:

(A) The voters agree to restructure existing bond moneys to authorize a district to additionally use those moneys for the purposes described in paragraph (1).

(B) The existing bond moneys are currently authorized to be used for the
 purposes described in paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 197, Sec. 1.   (AB 671)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.1.

(a) The Lindsay-Strathmore Memorial District may enter into a joint powers agreement with the Strathmore Public Utility District to provide for the management, maintenance, and operation of the memorial district property and improvements located at Strathmore, California, and for the use by the public utility district of the real property and improvements owned by the memorial district for offices, maintenance, and storage facilities. 

(b) This section applies only to the Lindsay-Strathmore Memorial District in Tulare County. This section is not intended to amend any of the provisions of Section 1266, and use of the Lindsay-Strathmore Memorial District property by the Strathmore Public Utility District under this section is not an abandonment of the facility by the Lindsay-Strathmore Memorial District or the veterans’ organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.3.

When the district desires to sell real property that was donated to the district by a city or county, the district shall offer to reconvey it to the city or county before selling it and shall reconvey it if the city or county agrees to accept it. If the property was sold to the district by a city or county, or was given or sold by a private person, or his successors in interest as determined by the district, the district shall offer to reconvey it at the then market price as determined by it, before selling it to any other person. In any case no sale or other use of the real property shall be made which is contrary to the provisions of any instrument under which the district holds title to or any interest in the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 931.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.

Every district may:

(a) Cause to be levied and collected in any year a special tax not to exceed three-tenths of one cent ($0.003) on the one dollar ($1) of assessed valuation of all the taxable property in the district, exclusive of any tax which may be required to pay the principal of and interest upon any bonded indebtedness of the district, in addition to all other taxes provided for by law upon the taxable property of the district and to be paid into a special fund in the county treasury to be known as the memorial district fund. In no event shall the tax exceed an amount that is sufficient to pay the estimated expenses of operating and maintaining the memorial district for the next year and the estimated capital outlay of the district for the next two years.

(b) Incur, through the board of supervisors, bonded indebtedness on behalf of the district for the purpose of exercising any of the powers of the district or accomplishing any of the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Cause to be levied and collected in any one year a special tax sufficient to pay the principal of and interest upon all bonded indebtedness of the district incurred as herein provided, in addition to all other taxes provided for by law or by the provisions of this chapter and to be paid into a special fund in the county treasury to be known as the memorial district bond retirement fund.

(d) Refund or retire any indebtedness that may exist against the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 895.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.1.

When a district is authorized to provide and maintain indoor and outdoor park and recreation facilities including swimming pools, picnic areas and playgrounds, unobligated funds of the district accumulated prior to the authorization may be used for said purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1497.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.5.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1193.

Every district may combine with the county in which it is located or with any incorporated city wholly within the county, in the accomplishment of any of the purposes of this chapter, and to that end hold jointly with such county or city any property acquired or made available for such purposes, and expend money in conjunction with such county or city in accomplishing any of the purposes hereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.

The powers of the district, except as otherwise expressly provided, shall be exercised by the board of directors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.

The general district election shall be governed by the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law and be held in every district formed under the provisions of this chapter on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1195.2.

If the board of directors of the district shall fail to take the action necessary to hold a general district election pursuant to Section 1195, the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is situated may call and hold a special election to vote for members of the board of directors of the district. Such special election shall be held and conducted pursuant to the provisions of Section 1180, at the expense of the district. If, on the 40th day prior to the day fixed for such special election, not more than one candidate has been nominated for each office of member of the board of directors to be filled at such election, and if on the 30th day prior to the day fixed for such election, a petition signed by 5 percent of the qualified electors in the district, requesting that such election be held, has not been presented to the board of supervisors, such election shall not be held, and the board of supervisors shall appoint persons to fill such offices and shall give notice that such election will not be held, substantially as provided in Section 1195.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 417.)
-------------------------------------------

1197.

The board shall consist of five members who shall be registered electors residing within the district or proposed district at the time of their election and shall be elected by the qualified electors of the district. A majority of the seats on the board shall be designated for veterans, as defined in Section 940. Any board seat that is so designated, but is not currently filled by a qualifying individual, shall be filled by a qualified individual at the next election at which that seat is to be filled. Members shall serve without compensation, but shall be entitled to actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of duties. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1198.

The board first elected in any district shall hold its first meeting in the meeting room of the board of supervisors commencing at ten o'clock a.m. on the first Monday following the date of declaration by the board of supervisors of the result of the special election at which the board was elected. The board shall elect one of its members president, and shall elect a secretary, and shall provide for the time and place of holding meetings and the manner in which special meetings may be called. The board may establish rules for proceedings of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1198.5.

(a) The secretary of every memorial district shall annually prepare a financial report signed by the board of directors containing the following information and related data in such detail as may be necessary to accurately disclose its financial condition and operations during the preceding fiscal year:

(1) Assets and liabilities at the beginning and end of the fiscal year.

(2) Receipts of any kind and the sources thereof.

(3) Disbursements of any kind and the purposes thereof, including funding distributed to providers of supportive
 services pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1191.

(4) A list of all contracts, transactions, agreements, or other obligations entered into.

(b) The board of every memorial district shall provide for the safekeeping of all records, at such places as the board may order and shall transfer such records to such boards as are subsequently elected under the provisions of this chapter.

(c) The secretary of a memorial district may exclude information included in reports prepared
 pursuant to Section 26909, 53891, or 53901 of the Government Code from the report required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 183, Sec. 1.   (AB 1908)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1199.

The president shall sign all contracts on behalf of the district and shall certify to the county auditor all lawful demands against the district payable from the memorial district fund and from the memorial district bond fund after such demands have first been approved by at least three members of the board. The president shall also perform any other duties imposed by the board. The secretary shall countersign all contracts on behalf of the district and perform any other duties precribed by the board. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but all official acts of the board must receive the affirmative vote, signature, or approval, as the case may require, of at least three members of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1200.

The moneys in the several funds of the district shall be paid out by the county treasurer only upon warrants drawn by the county auditor against the appropriate district fund. The county auditor shall draw warrants against the memorial district bond retirement fund, if that fund contains sufficient moneys, and if not, then, against any other funds of the district in payment of all valid and outstanding bonds of the district at maturity and of interest coupons thereon when due, upon presentation to the county auditor of the bonds or coupons by the owners thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 114, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

The county auditor shall also draw warrants against the memorial district fund and against the memorial district bond fund, in payment of lawful claims against the district certified to the county auditor by the president of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 114, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

The board shall, annually, at least fifteen days before the first day of the month in which the board of supervisors is required by law to levy the taxes required for county purposes, furnish to the board of supervisors and to the auditor estimates in writing of the minimum amount of money required for the payment of the principal of and interest upon all bonded indebtedness of the district; and also of the minimum amount of money required by the district for any other purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.

The board of supervisors shall annually at the time of levying county taxes and until all bonded indebtedness of the district is fully paid, levy and cause to be collected by the county tax collector a tax on all taxable property in the district sufficient for the payment of the principal of and interest upon all bonded indebtedness of the district. This tax shall be known as the memorial district bond retirement tax.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.

The board of supervisors shall in like manner and until all other expenses and claims are fully paid, levy and cause to be collected by the county tax collector a tax sufficient for the payment of all other expenses and claims of the district. This tax shall be known as the memorial district tax.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1205.

The memorial district tax levied in any one year shall not exceed the rate of three-tenths of one cent ($0.003) on each dollar ($1) of the assessed valuation of all taxable property in the district, exclusive of any tax which may be required to pay the principal of and interest upon any bonded indebtedness of the district. In no event shall the tax exceed an amount that is sufficient to pay the estimated expenses of operating and maintaining the memorial district for the next year and the estimated capital outlay of the district for the next two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 895.)
-------------------------------------------

1206.

Taxes shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the memorial district bond retirement fund or to the credit of the memorial district fund, as the purpose of the tax determines.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1207.

Taxes become delinquent at the time the county taxes become delinquent and shall bear like penalties for delinquency. All taxes shall be a lien upon all the taxable property in the district, and shall be of the same force and effect as the liens for county taxes. Their collection shall be enforced by the same means provided for the enforcement of liens for county taxes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1208.

Boards of supervisors, governing bodies of incorporated cities and school districts, and all authorities having control of public lands within this State may on behalf of the county, city, school district, park area, or public agency convey, lease, or make available to districts, either gratuitously or for compensation, sites upon lands under their control or jurisdiction, for the erection and maintenance thereon by districts of assembly or memorial halls, buildings, and meeting places, whenever in the reasonable discretion of such board, body, or authority, such sites can be so conveyed, leased, or made available without inconvenience to the interests of the particular county, city, school district, park, or public agency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Claims [1209. - 1209.]

1209.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bonds [1210. - 1219.]

1210.

Bonds of a district may be issued, sold, and the proceeds thereof expended in the exercise of any of the powers of the district or in the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter whenever two-thirds of the registered electors of the district who vote upon a proposal to issue bonds vote in favor thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1211.

The board may, and upon petition of eight per cent of the registered electors of the district shall, submit to the electors of the district the question whether bonds of the district shall be issued and sold for the purposes set forth by the board in the notice calling the election at which the question is submitted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1212.

The question may be submitted at a special bond election called for that purpose or at a general district election. If called upon petition of the electors of the district, the question shall be submitted not later than the ninetieth day after the filing of the petition therefor with the secretary of the board. The notice calling the election shall be entered in the minutes of the board and in addition to other requirements of this chapter governing the general district election shall contain a statement of the purpose of the proposed bond issue, the amount of bonds proposed to be issued, and the rate of interest, not exceeding six per cent, to be paid thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1213.

If the question whether bonds of the district are to be issued is submitted at a special election, such election shall be noticed, called, conducted, governed, and regulated, in the same manner prescribed for the general district election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1214.

If at such election two-thirds of the votes cast are in favor of issuing the bonds of the district, the board shall cause that fact to be entered upon its minutes and shall at once certify to the board of supervisors all of the proceedings of the board in connection with the proposed bond issue, including the purpose thereof, the amount thereof, rate of interest to be paid thereon, and the result of the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1215.

Thereupon, the board of supervisors, by an order entered in its minutes, shall provide for the issuance and sale of bonds of the district in the amount approved by the electors of the district at the election and shall provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds into the county treasury to the credit of a special fund known as the memorial district bond fund which shall be used for the purposes specified in the order of the board of directors calling the special election and shall be expended upon warrants of the county auditor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1216.

The board of supervisors shall issue and sell the bonds of the district in the manner and form prescribed by law for county bonds and subject to the conditions therein specified regarding the denominations, maturities, and interest rates of county bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1217.

If any officer whose signature, countersignature, or attestation appears on any district bonds or coupons thereof, ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser thereof, such signature, countersignature, or attestation shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if such officer had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds. The signature upon the coupons of the person who is county auditor at the date of such bonds shall be valid although the bonds themselves may be attested by a different person who is county auditor at the time of delivery of the bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1218.

The board of supervisors at the time of making the levy of taxes for county purposes shall levy a tax for that year upon the taxable property in the district for the interest and redemption of district bonds. Such tax shall not be less than sufficient to pay the interest of the bonds for that year and the portion of the principal due or to become due during the year, and in any event shall be sufficient to raise annually for the first half of the term of the bonds the sum necessary to pay the interest thereon; and during the balance of the term, sufficient to pay the annual interest and to pay annually a proportion of the principal of the bonds equal to a sum produced by taking the whole amount of the bonds outstanding and dividing it by the number of years the bonds then have to run. All money so collected shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the district bond retirement fund and be used for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds and for no other purpose until all bonded indebtedness of the district has been paid in full. The principal and interest on bonds shall be paid by the county treasurer upon the warrant of the county auditor out of the district bond retirement fund if that fund has sufficient moneys and otherwise out of any other funds of the district. The county auditor shall cancel and retain such bonds and coupons when he draws his warrants on the treasurer in favor of the owners thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1219.

Whenever the bonds of a district have been investigated and certified by any officer of this state authorized to make such investigation and certification, and by the authority of such certification have been declared to be legal for investment by savings banks of this state, then such bonds may be lawfully purchased or received in pledge for loans by savings banks, building and loan associations, trust companies, insurance companies, guardians, conservators, executors, administrators, special administrators, or by any public officer within this state holding funds which by law may be invested or loaned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Construction and Alteration of Halls, Buildings and Meeting Places [1221. - 1224.]

1221.

No contract for the construction or alteration of any hall, building or meeting place shall be let until such time as professional estimates of the cost of such construction or alteration have been submitted to, considered, and approved by a majority of the board at an official meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

1222.

No contract shall be let for the construction or alteration of any hall, building or meeting place unless such project can be completed and be ready for occupancy and use with the funds the district has on hand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

1223.

No contract for the construction or alteration of any hall, building or meeting place is valid, and no district funds shall be paid for any work done under such a contract or for any labor or materials furnished under such contract, unless the plans and specifications comply in every particular with the provisions of the Uniform Building Code and the building code and regulations of the city or county in which the building is to be located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

1224.

If the cost of construction or alteration under the contract is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, from time to time, as the work of construction or alteration progresses, a certified architect or a certified structural engineer, hired by the district, shall make reports showing, of his own personal knowledge, that the work during the period covered by the report has been performed and materials used and installed, in every particular, in accordance with the approved plans and specifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Annexation [1251. - 1259.]

1251.

The boundaries of any district organized or existing under this chapter may be altered and new territory annexed to, and incorporated within, it pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.

To qualify for annexation, new territory shall be contiguous to the existing district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.

Proceedings may be commenced for the annexation of territory to an existing district by petition filed with the county clerk and signed by registered voters residing within the territory to be annexed equal in number to at least eight percent of the number of votes cast in the territory proposed to be annexed for the office of Governor at the last general election at which a Governor was elected. If both incorporated and unincorporated territory are included within the new territory, the petition shall be signed by registered voters equal in number in each territory to at least eight percent of the votes so cast therein for Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

1254.

The petition shall be addressed to the board of supervisors of the county within which the district is situated, shall be signed by the number of qualified registered voters specified in Section 1253, and shall propose and set forth:

(a) The annexation of new territory under this article.

(b) The calling by the board of supervisors of a meeting to conduct a hearing upon the question whether the new territory should be annexed.

(c) An accurate description of the boundaries of the new territory specifying what portion of the territory is incorporated and what portion unincorporated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.

Within 30 days after the filing of the petition the county elections official shall find and certify whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of qualified registered voters of the territory proposed to be annexed and of the incorporated and unincorporated portions thereof and shall present the petition with the certificate of their findings attached thereto to the board of supervisors at its first regular meeting held 10 days from the date of certification of the petition. At the regular meeting the board shall ascertain whether the petition in all respects complies with the requirements therefor, except that the certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the sufficiency of the signatures to the petition. If the
 board finds that the petition complies with the requirements, it shall at the same regular meeting fix a time and place for the hearing of the petition not less than 20 days nor more than 40 days after the date of the meeting, and shall direct the clerk of the board to publish a notice once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper circulated in the territory that is proposed to be annexed, and that the board deems most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 105.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.

The notice required in Section 1255 shall state the fact that the board has fixed the time and place, which shall be stated in the notice, for a hearing on the matter of the annexation of territory to the memorial district. The notice shall describe the territory or shall specify the exterior boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

1257.
